Arkansas, session 2025, SB415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 75, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
4-75-104. Delinquencies on sales of petroleum products by wholesalers.
(a)(1) A wholesaler of petroleum products may report a delinquent
payment due to the wholesaler by a business for the sale of petroleum
products to the Division of Environmental Quality in writing, including
without limitation by email or fax, within two (2) business days after a
delinquent payment is due.
(2) The report by a wholesaler under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall set forth the:
(A) Name of the delinquent business;
(B) Business address of the delinquent business;
*CRH195*
03/10/2025 2:09:49 PM CRH195

SB415
(C) Date of the sale and delivery of the petroleum product
with the past due payment;
(D) Amount due for the petroleum product or other
delinquent amounts owed to the wholesaler by the delinquent business; and
(E) Name and business address of the wholesaler.
(b)(1) After receiving a report of a delinquencies under subsection
(a) of this section, the division shall "red-tag" the delinquent business
until a notice of removal from the delinquent list has been given by the
division.
(2) The division shall maintain a list of all delinquencies
reported to the division.
(3) Petroleum products shall not be delivered to a delinquent
business on the list under subdivision (b)(2) of this section until the "red
tag" has been removed by the division.
(c)(1) A delinquent business that is on the list under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section shall pay the delinquent fees to the wholesaler by
cash, electronic transfer of funds, United States postal money order, postal
note, express money order, cashier's check, certified check, or bank
exchange.
(2)(A) A wholesaler that receives a full payment under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall report receipt of the full payment
to the division no later than the next business day following receipt of the
payment.
(B) The division shall remove the "red tag" on the
delinquent business upon receipt of notification of the full payment under
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section.
(d)(1)(A) If a delinquent business contends that the delinquent
business was placed on the delinquent list because of a dispute involving the
quality or quantity of the petroleum product or another factor involved in
the sale of or purchase of the petroleum product, the delinquent business may
file a statement in writing to the division setting forth in detail the
reason why a delinquency should not exist.
(B) If a delinquent business files a written statement
under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section, the delinquent business shall
provide a copy of the written statement to the wholesaler.
(2)(A) A wholesaler also may file a statement in writing to the
03/10/2025 2:09:49 PM CRH195

SB415
division regarding the delinquency in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(B) If a wholesaler files a statement under subdivision
(d)(2)(A) of this section, the statement shall be filed within three (3)
business days of the wholesaler receiving the written statement of the
delinquent business under subdivision (d)(1)(B) of this section.
(3) The division shall review the written statements filed with
the division under subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section and determine
whether the "red-tag" on the delinquent business should be removed.




























03/10/2025 2:09:49 PM CRH195